Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 7 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-24-120.
Penalty for falsification of records.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statements or falsifies or permits to be falsified any records of the fund in any attempt to defraud the fund, as a result of such an act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, on conviction, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $500.00, imprisonment not to exceed 12 months, or both.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-24-120

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1.

47-24-121.
Correction of errors.

If any change or error in the records results in any member or beneficiary receiving from the fund more or less than he or she would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the board shall have the power to correct such error and to adjust the payments as far as practicable in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member or beneficiary was correctly entitled shall be paid.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-24-121

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1.

47-24-122.
Provisions are noncontractual.

The benefits provided under this chapter shall not be a part of any contract and shall be subject to future legislation.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-24-122

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1.